Tennessee statutes. Title 46 Cemeteries
Chapter 2

Cemetery Companies

46-2-101. Cemetery rules and regulations.

The owner of every cemetery may make, adopt, and enforce, and from time to time may amend, add to, revise, change, modify, or abolish, reasonable rules and regulations for:

The use, care, control, management, restriction, and protection of the cemetery, and of all parts and subdivisions of the cemetery;

Restricting, limiting, and regulating the use of all property within the cemetery;

Regulating and preventing the introduction and care of plants or shrubs within the grounds;

Regulating the conduct of persons and preventing improper assemblages in the cemetery; and

All other purposes deemed necessary by the owner of the cemetery for the proper conduct of the business of the cemetery and the protection or safeguarding of the premises and the principles, plans, and ideas on which the cemetery was organized.

The owner of the cemetery may prescribe penalties for the violation of any rule or regulation. These penalties may be recovered by the owner of the cemetery in a civil action.

The rules and regulations shall be plainly printed or typewritten, posted conspicuously and maintained, subject to inspection and copying, at the usual place for transacting the regular business of the cemetery; provided, that no cemetery to which chapter 1 of this title is applicable has the power to adopt any rule or regulation in conflict with chapter 1 of this title or in derogation of the contract rights of lot owners.

The owner of every cemetery has the further right to establish reasonable rules and regulations regarding the type, material, design, composition, finish, and specifications of all commodities to be used or installed in the cemetery. The rules and regulations shall be posted conspicuously and maintained, subject to inspection and copying, at the usual place for transacting the regular business of the cemetery. No cemetery owner has the right to prevent the use of any commodity purchased by a lot owner, or the owner's representative, agent, or heirs or assigns from any source; provided, that the use meets the rules.

A cemetery owner shall be permitted to prohibit the installation of a commodity by noncemetery personnel; provided, that the fee charged by the cemetery owner for installation of the commodity does not exceed twenty-six cents (26¢) per square inch of the ground covered by the commodity. At the end of each calendar year, the cemetery owner shall be permitted to increase the fee for the installation of commodities by no more than the percentage representing the consumer price index at the end of that calendar year. The charge for installation of a commodity by the cemetery owner shall be the same to all persons, regardless of the source of the commodity. The cemetery owner shall install all commodities furnished from sources other than the cemetery within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the commodity, weather permitting.

If the fee charged by a cemetery owner for installation of a commodity exceeds the fee scale described in subdivision (b)(2), then the cemetery owner shall permit installation of the commodity by noncemetery personnel, if requested by the lot owner, or the owner's representative, agent, or heirs or assigns. If noncemetery personnel are permitted to install a commodity, they shall not be denied reasonable access to the lot or grave space for the purpose of installing or servicing the commodity. The cemetery owner shall not deny information pertinent to the place of burial and respective grave location or installation location of the commodity. The information shall be furnished within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed fourteen (14) days after receipt of the request for information. The cemetery owner shall not charge for furnishing the information necessary for the proper installation of the commodity.

The cemetery owner shall not charge for any service not performed. The cemetery owner shall be allowed to charge an administrative, processing, or documentation fee; provided, however, that the fee is an equal amount charged to all cemetery customers and that the fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per agreement or transaction, including, but not limited to, allowing noncemetery personnel to install or have installed a commodity or monument. The cemetery owner shall not charge any fees on any transaction in addition to the cost of the merchandise or services other than the administrative, processing, or documentation fee.

All cemetery owners shall have a full and complete schedule of all charges for services provided by the cemetery plainly printed or typewritten, posted conspicuously and maintained, subject to inspection and copying, at the usual place for transacting the regular business of the cemetery. Any cemetery company that sells funeral merchandise must maintain a price list for that funeral merchandise that shall be provided to any person who inquires about funeral merchandise or the price of such merchandise.

Acts 1873, ch. 94, § 4; Shan., § 3053; mod. Code 1932, § 5372; Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 3; T.C.A., § 46-302; Acts 1980, ch. 780, §§ 8, 9; T.C.A., 46-3-102; T.C.A., 46-3-103; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5; 2016, ch. 838, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-101 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; 1895, ch. 131, § 1; 1899, ch. 277, § 1; Shan., § 2181; Acts 1919, ch. 195, § 1; Code 1932, § 3919; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 46-101; T.C.A., § 46-201; Acts 1984, ch. 585, § 1; 1986, ch. 693, § 10), concerning purchase and subdivision of land, sale of lots, and approval of cemetery use, was transferred to § 46-1-108 by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

Former § 46-3-103 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

Chapter 3, §§ 46-3-101—46-3-114, is effective until January 1, 2007. See the parallel reference table at the beginning of this title regarding the reorganization of chapters 1-3 effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Containers for remains of persons not more than twelve (12) years old at death, § 68-4-112.

Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, §§ 2, 7, 8.

46-2-102. Action of trespass for damage.

All offenders shall be liable in an action of trespass in the name of the managers or trustees, to pay all damages that have been occasioned by their unlawful acts, which money, when recovered, shall be applied by the managers or trustees to the reparation of the property injured or destroyed.

Acts 1873, ch. 94, § 6; Shan., § 3059; Code 1932, § 5379; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-308; T.C.A. § 46-3-108; T.C.A. § 46-3-109; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-102 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; 1895, ch. 131, § 1; 1899, ch. 277, § 1; Shan., § 2181; Acts 1919, ch. 195, § 1; Code 1932, § 3919; Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A,. (orig. ed.), § 46-102; T.C.A., § 46-202), concerning lots to be free from attachment or execution, was transferred to § 46-1-108 by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

Former § 46-3-109 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

This section may be superseded by the uniform disposition of unclaimed property law compiled in title 66, ch. 29, part 1. See §§ 66-29-104, 66-29-109, 66-29-110, 66-29-112 and 66-29-132.

Chapter 3, §§ 46-3-101—46-3-114, is effective until January 1, 2007. See the parallel reference table at the beginning of this title regarding the reorganization of chapters 1-3 effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

46-2-103. Escheat of lots to cemetery owner.

In order to facilitate a more efficient and economical system for caring for and maintaining and improving cemeteries owned and operated by municipalities, corporations and associations within this state, it is provided that after March 21, 1955, all vacant cemetery lots and grave spaces owned by any person dying intestate without issue and leaving no known relatives entitled by the law of descent to the cemetery lots and grave spaces shall escheat to the municipalities, corporations, associations or other owners of a cemetery where vacant lots and grave spaces exist, owned by any person dying testate without devising the vacant cemetery lots or grave spaces, and leaving no lawful heirs, as the case may be, entitled by law to take the vacant cemetery lots or grave spaces, or where the devisees or heirs are incapable of taking the vacant cemetery lots or grave spaces and where there are no lawful heirs, as the case may be.

Acts 1955, ch. 279, § 1; T.C.A., § 46-309; T.C.A., § 46-3-109; T.C.A., § 46-3-110; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-103 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; Shan., § 2184; Code 1932, § 3922; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-103; 1976, ch. 773, § 3; T.C.A., § 46-203), concerning receiving and holding of grants and bequests, was transferred to § 46-1-109 by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

Former § 46-3-110 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

46-2-104. Suit for escheat — Notice — Parties.

In all cases where municipalities, corporations, associations or other owners of cemeteries have a good right to believe any vacant cemetery lots or grave spaces have escheated to it, the municipalities, corporations, associations or other owners are empowered to bring suit for the escheated property and shall make defendants to its bill filed in the cause the personal representative of the deceased, if known, and all other persons who are in possession or in any manner or way claim any interest in or to the vacant cemetery lots or grave spaces. If the parties are residents of the state, they shall be served with process; if the parties are nonresidents of the state, they shall be made parties by publication, according to law. In addition to the defendants named pursuant to this section under the bill, there shall be publication made for thirty (30) days in a newspaper in the county in which the bill is filed, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in the nearest newspaper so published, calling upon unknown heirs of the deceased person claiming under the deceased person, in any manner or way, whatever, to enter an appearance as defendants to the bill or suit, and all persons having an interest in the bill or suit may come into court and defend the bill or suit according to the rule of the court.

Acts 1955, ch. 279, § 2; T.C.A., § 46-310; T.C.A., § 46-3-110; T.C.A., § 46-3-111; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-104 (Acts 1907, ch. 94, § 1; Shan., § 2185a1; Code 1932, § 3936; Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-104; T.C.A., § 46-204), concerning sale of land not suitable or needed for cemetery purposes, was transferred to § 46-1-110 by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

Former § 46-3-111 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

46-2-105. Hearing and decree of escheat.

In determining the escheat of any vacant cemetery lots or grave spaces to any municipalities, corporations, associations or other owners of cemeteries, the court shall hear proof, and if satisfied that it would be best for the vacant cemetery lots or grave spaces to escheat, shall decree accordingly.

Acts 1955, ch. 279, § 3; T.C.A., § 46-311; T.C.A., § 46-3-111; T.C.A., § 46-3-112; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-105 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; Shan., § 2182; Code 1932, § 3920; Acts 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-118; Acts 1976, ch. 708, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 46-218, 46-2-118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 40; 1995, ch. 134, § 1), concerning trespass or injury to cemetery property, interference with processions or religious exercises, and penalty, was transferred to § 46-1-313 by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Former § 46-3-112 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

46-2-106. Contracts for the sale of commodities.

A contract for the sale of a commodity shall be executed in duplicate and a signed copy given to the purchaser. The contract shall fully and conspicuously disclose in simple and readily understood language the terms and conditions of the contract.

The contract shall specifically state the purchase price of the commodity, the installation fee, and any charge for memorial care of the commodity made pursuant to § 46-1-204.

This section does not apply to cemeteries described in § 46-1-105; provided, that the cemeteries do not engage in the sale of memorials consisting of permanent monuments or gravemarkers of marble, granite, or bronze, bronze plaques, or bronze vases.

Acts 1980, ch. 780, § 11; T.C.A., § 46-3-112; T.C.A., § 46-3-113; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-106 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 9; Shan., § 2183; Code 1923, § 3921; Acts 1968, ch. 557, §§ 2, 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-119; T.C.A., §§ 46-219, 46-2-119; modified), concerning constable to make arrests for offenses, and appointment by county legislative body, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

Former § 46-3-113 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Purposes for which appropriations are authorized, § 5-9-101.

46-2-107. Funds to maintain cemeteries.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, upon a majority vote of the legislative body of the local government, the local government may draw upon its general fund and may solicit, receive, and utilize funds from all other sources, public or nonpublic, for the purpose of rehabilitating or maintaining dilapidated or abandoned cemeteries, or portions of cemeteries, subject to the limitations imposed by subsection (b). The maintenance may include:

Clearing vegetation or debris as appropriate, planting and otherwise improving the premises, cutting the grass and raking and cleaning cemetery plots at reasonable intervals;

Repairing and preserving the drains, water lines, roads, fences, statues, fountains and other structures;

Securing, maintaining or reconstructing the necessary records of lot ownership and burials;

Resetting or straightening tipped gravemarkers, monuments or memorials; or

Replacing damaged gravemarkers, monuments or memorials.

This section shall not be construed to authorize any local government to utilize funds to maintain cemeteries or portions of cemeteries that are presently maintained adequately or that maintain a sufficient improvement care trust fund pursuant to this chapter and chapter 1 of this title.

As used in this section, “local government” means any county, municipality, city, or other political subdivision of this state.

Acts 1980, ch. 814, § 1; T.C.A., § 46-3-114; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5; 2016, ch. 924, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-3-114 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

Attorney General Opinions. Use of public funds to maintain private roads to private cemeteries, OAG 99-097, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 97 (4/27/99).

T.C.A. § 54-7- 202 does not necessarily prohibit a county from repairing or maintaining roads in such a county if the roads lead to a cemetery and are available for public. It only prohibits the use of nonmonetary county resources for anything other than official county road purposes, subject to statutory exceptions. if a road qualifies as part of a dilapidated or abandoned cemetery, the county would be permitted to solicit, receive, and use funds to rehabilitate and maintain the cemetery, including any road that is a portion of the cemetery. However, T.C.A. § 46-2-107 does not abrogate T.C.A.. § 54-7-202’s prohibition on county officers and county employees from using any county vehicle, equipment, supplies, or road materials for non-official county road purposes. Accordingly, while a county may use those funds solicited and received for the purpose of rehabilitating a cemetery, it may not use its own nonmonetary resources, even if reimbursed with the funds received. Neither T.C. A. § 46-2-107 nor § 54-7-202 prohibits a county from contracting with a private contractor to repair and preserve these roads as long as the county has the authority to use its funds to repair and preserve the road in question. OAG 17-46, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (10/11/2017).